Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 9

Bond Issues and Warrants

69-5-901. County may issue and sell drainage bonds.

If the county legislative body determines that the estimated cost of reclamation and improvement of the district of land or levee or drainage district is greater than should be levied in a single year upon the lands benefited, it may fix the amount that shall be levied and collected each year, and may issue drainage bonds of the county, bearing interest payable semiannually, and may devote such bonds at par, with accrued interest, to the payment of the expenses and work as it progresses, or may sell the bonds at not less than par, with accrued interest, and devote the proceeds to such payment, and if, in the sale of the bonds, a premium is received, such premium shall be credited to the drainage fund. If the cost of such work exceeds the estimate, a new apportionment of the assessment may be made and levied and other bonds issued and sold in like manner, but in no case shall the bonds run longer than twenty (20) years.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 27; Shan., § 3871a107; Acts 1919, ch. 145, § 1; Code 1932, § 4335; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 24; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1401; T.C.A. §69-6-901.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, §47-14-103.

69-5-902. Payment of assessments before issuance of bonds.

Any property owner may pay the full amount of the benefit assessed against that person's property before the bonds are issued and receive a receipt in full for that amount. Such payment shall be made to the county trustee; it is the duty of the county clerk to certify to the trustee the amount of any such assessment when requested to do so, and the trustee shall enter the amount upon the assessment lists in the trustee's hands in a separate place provided for the assessment, and shall furnish the clerk with duplicate receipts given for all assessments so paid in full, one (1) of which the clerk shall deliver to the county mayor. The trustee shall also give a receipt to the property owner so paying in full.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 27; Shan., § 3871a108; Code 1932, § 4336; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1402; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-902.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-903. Terms of bonds — Signing — District to be indicated.

The terms and times of payment of the bonds so issued shall be fixed by the board of directors of the improvement district, and such bonds shall be signed by the county mayor and countersigned by the clerk of the county, each of the officers signing officially, and shall be verified either by the county seal or seal of the county clerk. Such bonds shall be issued for the benefit of the district numbered on the bonds, and each district shall be numbered by the county court and recorded by the county clerk in the drainage record, the record showing specifically the lands embraced in that district and upon which the assessment has not been previously paid in full.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 27; Shan., § 3871a109; Code 1932, § 4337; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1403; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-903.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-904. Bonds a charge on land in district only.

Each bond shall show expressly upon its face that it is to be paid only by assessments levied and collected on the lands within the district so designated and numbered, and for the benefit of which district such bond is issued. No assessment shall be levied or collected for the payment of such bond or bonds, or the interest on the bond or bonds, on any property, real or personal, outside the district so numbered, designated, and benefited.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 27; Shan., § 3871a110; Code 1932, § 4338; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1404; T.C.A. §69-6-904.

69-5-905. Denominations of bonds.

The bonds shall be in denominations of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00).

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 27; Shan., § 3871a111; Code 1932, § 4339; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1405; T.C.A. §69-6-905.

69-5-906. Multi-county districts — Issuance and payment of bonds.

When a district lies in more than one (1) county, the county court of each county shall so determine whether bonds shall be issued to meet the expenses, of the improvement so far as the lands of the district lie in that county; and, if so issued, the bonds shall be signed by the county mayor of such county, and countersigned by the county clerk, and verified by the county seal or seal of the county clerk, and shall be payable only out of the assessments levied for such improvement on the lands in such county, as provided by this part when such district is wholly in one (1) county.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 27; Shan., § 3871a112; Code 1932, § 4340; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1406; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-906.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-907. Payment in installments — Bond to secure installments.

In the sale of drainage bonds, the directors of the district, if in their judgment it is expedient, may contract with the purchasers of the bonds that the payment for the bonds may be made in such installments as may be agreed upon between them and the purchasers of the bonds; provided, that the payments of the installments agreed upon, as they mature, are amply secured by safe and solvent bond, made in double the amount of the entire deferred installments, payable to the state of Tennessee, for the use and benefit of the district and those entitled, and conditioned for the faithful payment of the installments, such bond to be approved by the unanimous vote of the board of directors of the district before the bond is accepted. The bond and a copy of the resolution of the board of directors approving them shall, on the order of the county court, be spread of record on the drainage record book, and the approval of the board of directors noted on the bond by the secretary of the board writing the word “approval” and signing “board of directors” by the secretary as secretary, or other equivalent words.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 10; Shan., § 3871a113; Code 1932, § 4341; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1407; T.C.A. §69-6-907.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Cross-References. Drainage record book, §69-5-140.

69-5-908. Bond of county trustee.

Whenever bonds of such districts are issued and sold under this chapter, or long-time warrants, as provided for by §69-5-909, are issued and sold, then the county trustee, before receiving such money, shall give bond, to be approved as the trustee's other bonds are approved in double the amount of the money to go into the trustee's hands from the sale of such bonds, or warrants, payable to the state, and conditioned that the trustee faithfully account for all such money; and if the trustee fails to execute such bond, it shall be a misdemeanor in office, for which the trustee may be removed from office; and such bond shall be recorded in the drainage record book, and the original filed with and preserved by the county clerk.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 10; Shan., § 3871a114; Code 1932, § 4342; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1408; T.C.A. §69-6-908.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor provisions in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§39-11-114,40-35-110,40-35-111.

Cross-References. Drainage record book, §69-5-140.

Penalty for misdemeanors, §§39-11-114,40-35-111.

69-5-909. Warrants issued instead of bonds.

If the board of directors of any improvement district deems best, instead of issuing bonds, it may direct that warrants shall be issued or drawn on such district, or on the county trustee, by the county mayor, to be paid out of the funds of such district only, and at such times as the assessments may be due, or as may be deemed best, the time of the maturity of assessments as fixed being considered, such warrants to be issued or drawn for all lawful demands on such district, and to bear interest at not more than six percent (6%) per annum.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 28; Shan., § 3871a115; Code 1932, § 4343; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1409; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-909.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-910. Surplus funds from sale of bonds or warrants.

When, in the making of any improvement in a district, bonds or warrants of such districts are sold for the purpose of providing funds for such improvement, any money is left from the proceeds of the sale after the improvement has been paid for, then in such cases the board of directors of such drainage district or drainage and levee district, with the approval of the county court of the county having jurisdiction of the cause, has the power to dispose of such surplus money by using such surplus funds for improving, if needed, the main improvement of the district, or for opening, making or improving such lateral drains or ditches in the district as may be deemed best, or such surplus funds and money may be used in paying all or in part any assessment made on the lands of the district and not yet collected, in which event such particular assessment, or part thereof, need not be collected. Alternately, such surplus of funds may be used in purchasing and retiring any of the bonds or warrants issued; provided, that they can be bought at not above par with any accrued interest on the bonds or warrants. The board of directors with the approval of the county court has the power to dispose of such surplus funds in any of the methods above set out that they and the court may deem best for such district, the court to concur, by its order or decree, in such disposition.

Acts 1917, ch. 26, § 1; Shan., § 3871a115½; Code 1932, § 4344; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1410; T.C.A. §69-6-910.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-911. Prepayment of deferred installments.

Any landowner owning land, upon which there now exists special assessments levied by any drainage district organized under the laws of this state, has the option, upon any date upon which the landowner pays such special assessments, to pay all or any part of the unmatured amount assessed against the tract or tracts of land owned by the landowner; provided, that no rebate or reduction shall be made for unearned interest upon such assessments.

Acts 1933, ch. 132, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 4292.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1411; T.C.A. §69-6-911.

69-5-912. Payment of assessments with bonds or coupons.

The bonds and/or interest coupons of the drainage district levying the assessment may be lawfully tendered to the trustee of the county in which the land lies by the person desiring to make such payments, and it is the duty of such trustee, to whom tender is made, to receive such bonds or coupons, or both, regardless of the date of maturity of such bonds or coupons, or both; to receive such bonds or coupons, or both, without deduction for maintenance, at par or face value, excluding interest upon past due coupons. Such payment, when so made, shall be as valid and complete a payment as though payment of such assessments had been made in cash. The trustee to whom payment is made may, at the trustee's option, require the commissions due and owing to the trustee by virtue of the trustee's collection of such assessments to be paid in cash instead of by bonds; but, where collection is made by a county trustee, other than by the trustee of the county where the district originates, then only one (1) trustee's fee can be collected and that fee must be paid to the trustee collecting the assessment. In cases where the coupons or bonds, or both, tendered by such person desiring to pay such taxes shall exceed in amount the assessments against such tract of land that the landowner is desirous of paying, the county trustee shall take into possession all of the coupons or bonds, or both, so tendered and, after computing the difference between the balance upon all such coupons or bonds, or both, and the assessment that it is proposed to pay, shall issue to the party paying such assessment a transferable credit memorandum, which credit memorandum may be used by such landowner or such landowner's assigns, in payment of any other drainage assessment due to the district in which payment is made.

Acts 1933, ch. 132, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4292.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1412; T.C.A. §69-6-912.

69-5-913. Cancellation of bonds given to pay assessments — Interest coupons — Suits to collect taxes.

Upon receipt of such coupons or bonds, or both, it is the duty of the county trustee to cancel them as now provided by law and to provide a record of such cancellation. If bonds tendered for payment contain interest coupons falling due beyond the date of maturity of the assessments that it is proposed to pay, then and in that event the county trustee shall not be required to receive such interest coupons in payment of these taxes. This does not apply, however, where both the assessment and coupons are past due; in this case, any past due coupons can be used to pay any or all assessments regardless of their due date.

Sections 69-5-911 — 69-5-914 do not apply where suits have been brought to collect taxes that are delinquent unless and until the costs and attorney's fees, if any, are paid into court or any other office where the case or cases are pending; such collection made with coupons or bonds, or both, must in turn be accepted by the county trustee in full settlement of the tax paid.

Acts 1933, ch. 132, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 4292.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1413; T.C.A. §69-6-913.

69-5-914. Multi-county districts — Payment by bond or coupon.

Where a drainage district is situated in more than one (1) county, it is the duty of the trustee of any county in which such district lies to accept coupons or bonds, or both, issued by such district in settlement of assessments levied against lands embraced in that portion of the district located in the trustee's county. It is lawful for any coupons or bonds, or both, so accepted in payment of assessments to be used by the trustee of any county in making a full settlement with the trustee of the county in which the district originated, such accounting in coupons or bonds, or both, to be considered and handled in all respects as a cash transaction.

Acts 1933, ch. 132, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 4292.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1414; T.C.A. §69-6-914.

69-5-915. Single county districts — Monthly settlements by trustees.

The county trustee of any county in which a drainage district has been organized under the laws of this state shall make monthly settlement with the county mayor of the county in which the district was organized, showing the drainage assessments collected during the month, giving date collected, tract number, name of owner, for what years assessments are paid, amount of assessments, interest and penalty, amount paid in cash, amount paid in bonds, coupons, or credit memorandums, and amount of credit memorandums issued during the month and still outstanding and to whom issued. The settlement shall also show what bonds, coupons or credit memorandums were received during the month in settlement of assessments and the date same were cancelled by the trustee. The settlement shall be filed with the county mayor as provided in this section, together with all cancelled bonds, coupons and credit memorandums, taking the county mayor's receipt for the settlement and, when approved by the county mayor, shall be copied on the drainage record book in the county clerk's office.

Acts 1935, ch. 159, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4292.5 (Williams, § 4244.1); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1415; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-915.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Drainage record book, §69-5-140.

69-5-916. Multi-county districts — Monthly settlements by trustees.

Where a drainage district is situated in more than one (1) county, it is the duty of the trustee of any county in which such district lies to make monthly settlement with the county mayor of the county in which the district was organized, as provided by §69-5-915; provided, that all cash collections shall be paid to the trustee of the county in which the district was organized to be placed to the credit of the drainage district as now provided by law.

Acts 1935, ch. 159, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4292.6 (Williams, § 4244.2); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1416; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-916.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-917. Disposition of receipts — Maintenance or administration certificates.

After each monthly settlement has been filed and approved as provided in §§69-5-915 and69-5-916, the board of directors of the drainage district shall ascertain what part or portion of the money, bonds, coupons, or credit memorandums were received for the preceding month, or prior to that time, on the maintenance or administration assessments, or both, and when so ascertained it shall certify the amount thereof to the county mayor, and the county legislative body is hereby given jurisdiction and authority, upon application of the board of directors, to make such disposition thereof as may seem just and equitable for the benefit and protection of the district and bondholders. The county legislative body may authorize the directors to issue and sell transferable maintenance or administration certificates, or both, against that portion or part of the bonds, coupons or credit memorandums belonging to the maintenance or administration fund as so ascertained by the directors and reported to the county mayor. The certificates, when so authorized, issued and sold, may be tendered to the trustee in settlement of drainage assessments of the district, and it is the duty of the trustee, to whom tender is made, to receive such certificates at face value in the same manner as now provided by law for paying assessments with coupons or bonds, or both.

Acts 1935, ch. 159, § 3; C. Supp. 1950,§ 4292.7 (Williams, § 4244.3); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1417; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-917.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-918. Lien of maintenance or administration certificates.

The maintenance or administration certificates, or both, when issued as provided in this part, shall constitute the same lien on the lands in the district, upon which assessments remain unpaid, as the unpaid coupons and bonds, and may be enforced in the same manner as now provided by law for enforcement of the lien of the coupons or bonds, or both.

Acts 1935, ch. 159, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 4292.8 (Williams, § 4244.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1418; T.C.A. §69-6-918.

69-5-919. Proceeds from sale of maintenance or administration certificates.

All funds received from sale of the maintenance or administration certificates, or both, shall be paid to the trustee and placed to the credit of the maintenance and administration fund, to be paid out on warrants as now provided by law.

Acts 1935, ch. 159, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 4292.9 (Williams, § 4244.5); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1419; T.C.A. §69-6-919.

69-5-920. Refunding bonds authorized — Terms.

For the general purpose of refunding all or any part of the bonded indebtedness, now or hereafter outstanding, of any drainage or levee district now or hereafter organized and existing under any law of this state, whenever in the judgment of the county legislative body of the county in which any such district was organized, it is advisable and for the best interest of the landowners of any such district, or whenever such district is or hereafter shall become unable to pay all or any part of the principal and interest or either the principal or interest of or on its outstanding bonded indebtedness, the county legislative body may issue refunding bonds of such district in an amount that shall not exceed in the aggregate the amount of bonds to be refunded, and the accrued interest on the bonds. Such refunding bonds shall be of such denomination or denominations, shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding forty (40) years from their date, and in such manner, amount or amounts, shall be payable at such place or places, and shall bear such rate of interest payable annually or semiannually as the county legislative body may determine. Such refunding bonds may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded upon consent of the holders of the bonds, or may be sold at such price and in such manner as the county legislative body may determine. Any expense resulting from the sale or issuance of such refunding bonds may be paid out of any available funds of the district. If the outstanding bonds have not matured, they may be refunded only with the consent of the holder or holders of the bonds, which consent shall be sufficiently evidenced by the surrender of the bonds to be refunded. Such refunding bonds shall be signed by the county mayor and countersigned by the county clerk, under the seal of the county or the seal of such clerk, and the interest coupons attached to the bonds shall be executed by the lithographed facsimile signature of the officials.

Acts 1935, ch. 51, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4341.1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 22, 36; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 25; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1420; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-920.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, §47-14-103.

69-5-921. Petition for issuance of refunding bonds.

The county legislative body has the authority to issue refunding bonds as provided for in this part, upon the filing with the county legislative body of a petition duly authorized and signed by the board of directors of the district whose outstanding bonds are desired to be refunded. The petition, among other appropriate recitals, shall set forth a description of the outstanding bonds proposed to be refunded, the reason for such refunding, whether or not the holders of the outstanding bonds have consented to the refunding of the bonds, the amount of refunding bonds proposed to be issued, including the proposed date or dates when such refunding bonds are to mature. The petition shall request the county legislative body, upon the giving of the notice and upon the holding of the hearing provided for in §69-5-924, to direct the issuance of such refunding bonds and to provide for the levy of taxes for the payment of the refunding bonds and the interest on the refunding bonds.

Acts 1935, ch. 51, § 2; 1935, ch. 78, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4341.2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1421; T.C.A. §69-6-921.

69-5-922. Refunding bonds — Notice of hearing.

Upon the filing of a petition as for issuance of refunding bonds, it is the duty of the county legislative body to set a date for the hearing of such petition and to direct the county clerk to cause to be published a notice in substantially the following form:

To all persons or corporations interested in lands or other property lying in District, County, Tennessee, take notice: That the aforementioned district, acting through its board of directors, has filed with the county legislative body of County, Tennessee, a petition requesting the county legislative body to provide for the refunding of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of such district, and that any person or corporation owning or having any interest in any land or property in the district may appear before the county legislative body at the court house in , Tennessee, at the hour of o'clock, M., on the day of 20 , and show cause why such bonds should not be refunded.

You are further notified that in the event the county legislative body, pursuant to the hearing, should enter an order, providing for the issuance of refunding bonds, any landowner shall have the right at any time within two (2) weeks from and after the entering of such order within which to pay the full amount of the principal tax or assessment chargeable to such landowner's land or any tract thereof, for the payment of the bonds proposed to be refunded, and any tract on which such tax or assessment shall be so paid shall thereupon be released from any tax or assessment for the payment of the refunding bonds so authorized to be issued, but shall remain subject to such other or additional taxes, if any, as may be levied pursuant to law. Take notice also that in the event a remonstrance or remonstrances against the issuance of refunding bonds be filed with the county legislative body on or prior to the date hereinabove set forth, signed by sixty percent (60%) or more of the landowners owning sixty percent (60%) or more of the aggregate acreage of lands within the district, then the county legislative body shall enter an order denying and dismissing the petition of the board of directors above referred to.

By order of the county legislative body of County, Tennessee, this day of , 20

County Clerk

Such notice shall be published weekly for at least two (2) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in the county and having a general circulation in the district, and the first of such publications shall occur at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for such hearing, and the last of such publications shall occur not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. A copy of such notice shall also be posted in a conspicuous place at the court house of the county where the hearing is to be held at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for such hearing.

Acts 1935, ch. 51, § 3; 1935, ch. 78, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4341.3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1422; T.C.A. §69-6-922.

69-5-923. Refunding bonds — Petition and notice in multi-county districts.

Where a district lies in more than one (1) county, the petition for issuance of refunding bonds shall be filed with the county legislative body of the county where the greater part of the lands of the district are situated, which the legislative body shall have full jurisdiction for the purposes of §§69-5-920 —69-5-927. The notice provided for in §69-5-922 shall, in such case, be published in one (1) newspaper published and having general circulation in each county where lands of the district are situated, and also by the posting of a copy of such notice in a conspicuous place at each court house in each such county. In the event there should be no newspaper published and of general circulation in any such county, then the aforementioned notice shall be given by posting not less than five (5) copies of the notice in five (5) public places in such county, and by posting at the court house as provided in this section.

Acts 1935, ch. 51, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 4341.4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1423; T.C.A. §69-6-923.

69-5-924. Hearing — Remonstrance.

At the time of the hearing provided for in §69-5-922, the county legislative body shall hear and dispose of all objections in a summary manner and its disposition of the objections shall be final and conclusive on all parties. In the event a remonstrance or remonstrances against the issuance of refunding bonds be filed with the county legislative body on or prior to the date set for such hearing, signed by sixty percent (60%) or more of the landowners owning sixty percent (60%) or more of the aggregate acreage of land within the district, then the county legislative body shall enter an order denying and dismissing the petition of the board of directors for the issuance of refunding bonds.

Acts 1935, ch. 51, § 5; 1935, ch. 78, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 4341.5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1424; T.C.A. §69-6-924.

69-5-925. Refunding bonds — Release of landowner from assessment.

Upon the entry by the county legislative body of an order providing for the issuance of refunding bonds of any such district, any landowner in the district shall have the right at any time within two (2) weeks from and after the entry of such order, within which to pay the full amount of the principal tax or assessment chargeable to that landowner's land or any tract of the landowner's land, for the payment of the bonds proposed to be refunded, and any tract on which such tax or assessment shall be so paid shall thereupon be released from any tax or assessment for the payment of the refunding bonds so authorized to be issued, but shall remain subject to such other or additional taxes, if any, as may be levied pursuant to law.

Acts 1935, ch. 51, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 4341.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1425; T.C.A. §69-6-925.

69-5-926. Refunding bonds — Extended assessments.

Upon the issuance of refunding bonds as provided for in §§69-5-920 —69-5-927, the time of payment of the subsequently accruing original annual installments of taxes shall be extended, and the taxes shall become due and payable in such greater number of annual installments and in such respective amounts as the county legislative body, in its order directing the issuance of refunding bonds, shall direct. And the county legislative body shall direct the county clerk to prepare and to certify a new drainage assessment book showing such extended assessments and to file the same with the county trustee, or with the respective county trustees in the event the district should embrace lands in more than one (1) county. The taxes shall be collected and the payment of the taxes enforced at the same time and in the same manner as is now provided by law for the collection and enforcement of payment of drainage taxes. It is the duty of the county legislative body in fixing the respective annual installments of the extended assessments to provide for the collection annually of amounts sufficient to provide for the payment of such refunding bonds and the accruing interest on the bonds.

Acts 1935, ch. 51, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 4341.7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1426; T.C.A. §69-6-926.

Cross-References. Drainage assessment book, §69-5-813.

69-5-927. Refunding bonds — Powers conferred on board of directors.

No proceedings shall be required for the issuance of refunding bonds of drainage or levee districts other than those provided by §§69-5-920 —69-5-927, and all powers necessary to be exercised by the board of directors of any drainage or levee district or by the county legislative body in order to carry out those sections are hereby conferred.

Acts 1935, ch. 51, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 4341.9; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1428; T.C.A. §69-6-927.

69-5-928. Borrowing money to pay bonds and interest.

If in any year, on account of the delinquent assessments, and the incidental delay in enforcing their collection, the funds are insufficient to pay the bonds and interest, or bonds or interest maturing for payment in that year, the board of directors of the district has the power to borrow the necessary money to make up the deficiency and prevent default, and may make a note or notes, in the name of the drainage district, or drainage and levee district, signed by the board officially. For security, the board may pledge or bind, for the payment of the note or notes, the delinquent, or unpaid assessment, for the particular year. The delinquent assessments, when collected, shall constitute a fund for the payment of the money borrowed. The amount so borrowed by the board of directors shall be paid to the trustee of the county to be used by the trustee as other funds are used in the payment of the bonds and interest maturing.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 4; Shan., § 3871a134; Code 1932, § 4366; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1429; T.C.A. §69-6-928.

69-5-929. Appointment of receiver for defaulting drainage district.

When any bond or interest coupon of any bond, issued by any district within the state has been past due for two (2) years, and payment has been demanded by the holder of any such at the place designated for payment in such instrument, and also to the chair of the board of directors of any such district, such holder of any bond, or interest coupon on any such bond, has the right to make application to any court of competent jurisdiction within the county or counties of the district for the appointment of a receiver for the defaulting district, and it is the duty of the court, upon presentation of a petition properly verified, to appoint a receiver in such case to collect the assessments and taxes due any such district.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 34b, as added by Acts 1923, ch. 73, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 3871a135b2; mod. Code 1932, § 4369; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1430; T.C.A. §69-6-929.

69-5-930. Powers of receiver — Removal and appointment of another.

Any receiver appointed pursuant to §69-5-929 shall have the power to institute suits for the collection of delinquent assessments in the same manner as the district itself would have had and with the same effect and to do all things necessary to collect delinquent assessments or other debts due the district. Such receiver shall first pay all costs out of the assessments as soon as collected, and shall then prorate the remainder to the payment of bonds and coupons then due. The receiver shall be under the jurisdiction and control of the court appointing the receiver, and shall have power to proceed in any court of competent jurisdiction where it is necessary to enforce any lien against any land within the district. The court shall have the power to discharge the receiver at any time and appoint another receiver, and when all bonds and interest coupons overdue have been paid, the receiver shall be discharged. The receiver shall have further authority to give a deed and pass good title to any lands in the district that may be advertised for sale and sold for delinquent taxes, subject only to the rights of the owner of the lands to redeem the land within two (2) years from the date of the sale, on payment of the amount paid by the purchaser for the land, with legal interest on the amount paid, to the date of redemption. Any person owning an undivided interest or any specific portion thereof or any part of any tract or tracts of land that is assessed for drainage sums assessed to another shall receive receipt in full for that person's taxes on paying such portion of the taxes as the claims of the property or such proportion of the taxes as that person's quantity of the property bears to the whole quantity taxed.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 34b, as added by Acts 1923, ch. 73, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 3871a135b3; mod. Code 1932, § 4370; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1431; T.C.A. §69-6-930.

69-5-931. County trustee's compensation.

The county trustee, for receiving and paying out money received from the sale of bonds and warrants issued and sold under this part, shall be entitled to a commission of one half of one percent (0.5%) for receiving the same, and one half of one percent (0.5%) for paying out the same. The trustee shall pay over to the trustee's successor in office any of the moneys and funds remaining in the trustee's hands at the expiration of the trustee's term of office, when the successor trustee has executed bond, as provided by §69-5-908. It is the duty of such succeeding trustee to execute such bond, and for failure to do so, the succeeding trustee shall be liable to the penalties provided by §69-5-908. Whichever trustee actually disburses the funds so arising from the sale of bonds or warrants shall be entitled to the commission of one half of one percent (0.5%); provided, that the succeeding trustee shall not be entitled to any commissions for receiving such funds from the predecessor trustee.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 12; Shan., § 3871a140; Code 1932, § 4375; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1432; T.C.A. §69-6-931.